Tennessee, session 114, SB1069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-17-120(e)(2), is amended by
deleting the semicolon at the end of the subdivision and substituting instead:
, which may be sent electronically;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1069
001033
- 1 -